Utah statutes.
78B-6-508.   Who may appear and defend.

All persons in occupation of, or having or claiming an interest in, any of the property described in the complaint, or in the damages for the taking, though not named, including shareholders in a mutual stock water company in a proceeding involving the taking of the company or property belonging to the company, may appear, plead and defend, each in respect to his own property or interest, or that claimed by him, in the same manner as if named in the complaint.

